Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202513-3315
Inland Port Authority Fund; created; use; investment.

The Inland Port Authority Fund is created. The fund shall be used by the State Treasurer to carry out section 13-3314. The fund shall consist of transfers by the Legislature and any federal funds which may become available for the purposes of the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Inland Port Authority Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 124.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.